District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.61

Certificate of registration.

(a)

No business enterprise shall be permitted to participate in a program established under this part unless the business has demonstrated its capability to perform and has been issued a certificate of registration under the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

(1)

A business enterprise seeking to be certified in a category under this subpart shall file with the Department a written application on such form as may be prescribed by the Department.

(2)

The application shall include, at a minimum, documents and information enumerated in rules established pursuant to § 2-218.72 and any other information the Department may require, and the following documents and information:

(A)

A certification of the correctness of the information provided;

(B)

Written evidence that the applicant is:

(i)

A bona fide local business enterprise;

(ii)

A bona fide disadvantaged business enterprise;

(iii)

A bona fide small business enterprise;

(iv)

A bona fide local business enterprise located in an enterprise zone;

(v)

A bona fide resident-owned business;

(vi)

A bona fide longtime resident business;

(vii)

A bona fide veteran-owned business enterprise; or

(viii)

A bona fide local manufacturing business enterprise;

(C)

Evidence of ability and character;

(D)

Evidence of financial position, which may be the applicant’s most recent financial statement. For the purposes of this subparagraph, the term “recent” means produced from current data no more than 90 days prior to the application date;

(E)

Any other information the Department may require; and

(F)

Federal income taxes, both corporate and personal, as well as District taxes, both corporate and personal.

(c)

The Department shall issue the applicant a certificate of registration if:

(1)

The information provided in the application or additional filings is satisfactory to the Department;

(2)

The business enterprise meets the standards of this subchapter; and

(3)

The applicant fulfills other requirements as may be established by the Department.

(c-1)

(1)

A certified business enterprise seeking a subsequent certificate of registration that has no material change in its business status shall be required to submit only a written application to renew its certificate of registration on a form as prescribed by the Department.

(2)

The application required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, shall include:

(A)

A no-change affidavit executed under penalty of perjury attesting that there has been no material change in the certified business enterprises’ business status and that the certified business enterprise still meets the certification requirements required under this subpart; and

(B)

Proof of clean hands and good standing as required by §§ 47-2861 and 29-102.08 or the certified business enterprises’ authorization that the Department may confirm clean hands and good standing with relevant District agencies.

(3)

A subsequent certificate of registration of a certified business enterprise that meets the requirements of this subsection shall be deemed approved upon filing of the written application.

(d)

A certificate of registration shall expire 3 years from the date of approval of the application. A business enterprise that is registered with the Department may voluntarily relinquish its registration as a certified business enterprise at any time prior to the expiration of the 3-year term.

(e)

Repealed.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2361, 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 2132(i), 53 DCR 6899
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 2062(g), 54 DCR 7052
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-207, § 2(p), 55 DCR 6107
Apr. 20, 2010, D.C. Law 18-141, § 2(n), 57 DCR 1485
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 13(c), 59 DCR 6190
June 10, 2014, D.C. Law 20-108, § 2(gg), 61 DCR 3892
Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-234, § 2(d), 62 DCR 458
This section is referenced in § 2-218.62, § 2-218.63, and § 2-218.65.
D.C. Law 16-192 added subsec. (e).
D.C. Law 17-20 rewrote subsec. (b)(1); and, in the introductory language and par. (1) of subsec. (c) and in subsec. (e), substituted “Department” for “Commission”. Prior to amendment, subsec. (b)(1) read as follows: “(1) An enterprise seeking to be certified as a local, small, or disadvantaged business enterprise, as a resident-owned business, as a resident business, or as a local business enterprise with its principal office located in an enterprise zone shall file with the Commission a written application on such form or forms as may be prescribed by the Commission or the Department.”
D.C. Law 17-207, in subsec. (b), inserted “longtime” preceding “resident business”.
D.C. Law 18-141, in subsec. (a)(1), substituted “Has demonstrated its capability to perform and been” for “Has been”; in subsec. (b)(2), deleted “and” from the end of par. (D); substituted “; and” for a period at the end of par. (E), and added par. (F); and, in subsec. (d), added the second sentence.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-108 rewrote (a) and (b)(1); substituted “documents and information enumerated in rules established pursuant to § 2-218.72 and any other information the Department may require, and the following documents and information” for “the following documents and information” in the introductory language of (b)(2); added (b)(2)(vii) and (viii) and made related changes; deleted “Commission or” preceding “Department” in (b)(2)(E); deleted “the Commission or” preceding “the Department” in (c)(3); and repealed (e).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-234 added (c-1); and substituted “3 years” for “2 years” and “3-year term” for “2-year term” in (d).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(o) of the Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-96, January 29, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 3403).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2361 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(i) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(i) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(i) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2062(g) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(o) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-156, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10919).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(o) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-251, January 23, 2008, 55 DCR 1259).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-108: Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that applications pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be subject to the provisions of the act.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that, except as provided in § 2-218.46(f), contracts existing or pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be affected by the provisions of the act.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.